Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1212.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 20, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-243, to read: START_STATUTE20-243. Health care insurer; covered individual; vaccine refusal; reimbursement rates; definitions A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a health care insurer may not reimburse a health professional at a different rate based on a covered individual's decision to refuse one or more vaccines. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Covered individual" means an insured, enrollee or subscriber of a health care insurer. 2. "Health care insurer" means a disability insurer, group disability insurer, blanket disability insurer, health care services organization, hospital services corporation, medical service corporation or hospital, medical, dental and optometric service corporation that issues a health plan in this state. 3. "Health professional" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3201. END_STATUTE